test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV-0-nakuy_vomit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - nákuy[vomit] :
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg1:       náskuy
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg2:       nánikuy
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg3:       nákuy
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1:       [náasiìkuy, náasaàkuy]
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [nádààsiìkuy, nádààsaàkuy]
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2:       náskuy
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2+Distr: nádàskuy
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3:       nágikuy
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3+Distr: nádàgikuy
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4:       náts'ikuy
    nákuy[vomit]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4+Distr: nádàts'ikuy
